New York, session 2025-2026, A4650.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 368-a of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (aa) to read as follows: 3 (aa) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contra- 4 ry, the department of health shall pay one hundred percent of the non- 5 federal share of any payments for services required to be provided by 6 applicable state law, but not required to be provided by federal law. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07534-01-5